District of Columbia statutes.
48-903.01

Rules and regulations; fees.

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations and may charge reasonable fees relating to the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, and dispensing of controlled substances within the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 301, 28 DCR 3081

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-531.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to implement D.C. Law 4-29, the “District of Columbia Uniformed Controlled Substances Act of 1981”, see Mayor’s Order 98-49, April 15, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2694).